Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 7
SEWER RATES - AREA OUTSIDE CITIES OR TOWNS

31-35-701. Cities or towns may provide service outside boundaries.

Any city or town owning an established sewerage system may, by ordinance, fix just, reasonable, and necessary rates for the connection with and use of the sewerage system, directly or indirectly, by owners of property situated in unincorporated territory without the boundaries of said city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1267, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-601 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-702. Governing body agency of state.

The governing body of such city or town is declared and determined to be an agency of the state of Colorado for the sole purpose of securing to owners of property situated in unincorporated territory without the boundaries of such city or town adequate sewerage service at just and reasonable rates and for the performance of the duties and functions set forth by this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-602 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-703. Publication of ordinance.

Notice of such rates shall be given by publication of the ordinance fixing the same, to which publication there shall be appended a special notice to owners of property in unincorporated territory without the boundaries of said city or town and using the sewerage system especially directing attention to said ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-603 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-704. Contents of ordinance.

Such ordinance and notice shall be published in conformity to law with reference to the times and publication of ordinances of such city or town. The ordinance shall contain a description of the property, the names of the owners thereof, as near as may be, and the annual rate charged to each such property for sewerage service. No error in the name of any property owner shall affect the validity of said ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-604 as it existed prior to 1975.

Cross references:

For requirements for passage of an ordinance, see part 1 of article 16 of this title.

31-35-705. Protest - board of adjustment.

Any owner of property affected by the terms of said ordinance may protest in writing to the governing body of such city or town as to the amount of the rate affecting such property at any time within two weeks after the first publication of said ordinance and notice. The governing body shall sit as a board of adjustment, pursuant to the authority of this part 7, and shall hear and determine all such protests and determine the fairness of said rates. If the rates prescribed in the proposed ordinance are determined to be unreasonable, the governing body shall amend such ordinance before final passage to conform to its findings in the premises. The final determination of the governing body shall be conclusive in the premises.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-605 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-706. Continuing annual charges.

The rates and charges so established shall be annual charges and shall be continuing annual charges from year to year until such ordinance is amended or repealed. The use of said sewerage system on or after the passage of said ordinance shall be conclusive evidence of the assent of the owner of the property to the provisions of said ordinance and of the acceptance of such service on the conditions and terms imposed thereby not in conflict with this part 7.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-606 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-707. Date and place of payment.

Such ordinance shall provide, among other things, that the rates so established per annum may be paid before October 1 of each year, at the offices of the municipal treasurer, and after said day payment thereof shall be delinquent.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-607 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-708. Nonpayment - penalty - lien.

In the event any person using said sewerage system neglects, fails, or refuses to pay when due the rates and charges as fixed by said ordinance, the property of such delinquent person shall not be disconnected from said sewerage system or denied the use thereof, but the rates and charges due and unpaid therefor shall be certified by the clerk to the board of county commissioners of the county in which said delinquent user's property is located on or before November 1 of each year and thereupon and until paid shall be a lien upon the real property so served by said sewerage connections. The lien shall be levied, certified, received, or collected by sale, annually from year to year by the proper county officials, as are county taxes, and the proceeds thereof shall be remitted each month to such city or town.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1268, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-608 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-709. Voluntary discontinuance by owner.

Nothing in this part 7 shall deny any property owner affected by such ordinance voluntary discontinuance of the service of such sewerage system. Such discontinuance of service shall be evidenced by disconnection of said property from said sewer system and not otherwise. In the event of such discontinuance, it is the duty of the governing body to abate all rates or charges accruing thereafter by the terms of such ordinance, and thereafter no such charge shall be certified for collection.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1269, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-609 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-710. Duty to maintain system.

Nothing in this part 7 shall impose upon any such city or town the duty of maintaining sewers or a sewerage system not owned by it or required for the use of its inhabitants. Such city or town shall maintain, during the life of the ordinance provided for in section 31-35-701, its own sewerage system for the adequate use and benefit of property owners in unincorporated territory without the boundaries thereof whose property has been made subject to such ordinance.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1269, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-610 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-711. Rates may be collected by action.

Rates imposed upon property which by reason of its ownership, character, or use is not subject to taxation or lien under the state constitution and laws of this state may be collected by any appropriate legal action begun in the district court in the county in which such property is located.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1269, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-611 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-35-712. Owner to obtain permit - penalty.

Any person making or causing to be made a connection of sewers serving property in any unincorporated territory, directly or indirectly, with a sewerage system of any city or town without a permit from said city or town and after the passage of the ordinance provided for in section 31-35-701 commits a class 2 misdemeanor.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1269, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

Entire section amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3257, § 543, effective March 1, 2022.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-35-612 as it existed prior to 1975.